District of Columbia statutes.
2-1906

Waiver.

(a)

A communication-impaired person entitled to the services of an interpreter under this chapter may waive the services of a qualified interpreter in whole or in part. The waiver must be made in writing, or orally on the record, by the communication-impaired person following consultation with that person’s attorney. If the person does not have an attorney, the waiver must be made in writing by the communication-impaired person in that person’s written language and the waiver must be approved in writing, by the appointing authority.

(b)

A communication-impaired person who has waived an interpreter under this section may provide his or her own interpreter at his or her own expense, without regard to whether the interpreter is qualified under this chapter.

History

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 7, 34 DCR 7426

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2706.